Maine, session 132, LD1617.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4102, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 474, Pt. G, §1, is
further amended to read:
5. Maine exclusion amount. For estates of decedents dying on or after January 1,
2013, but before January 1, 2016, "Maine exclusion amount" means $2,000,000. For
estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2016, but before January 1, 2018, "Maine
exclusion amount" means the basic exclusion amount determined for the calendar year in
accordance with the Code, Section 2010(c)(3). For estates of decedents dying on or after
January 1, 2018, but before January 1, 2026, "Maine exclusion amount" means $5,600,000.
For estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2026, "Maine exclusion amount"
means $1,000,000 plus any additional exclusion amount allowed under section 4120.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §4120 is enacted to read:
§4120. Additional exclusion amount for family farms and aquaculture, fishing and
wood harvesting businesses
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Commercial agricultural production" means commercial production of crops,
maple syrup, honey, plants, trees, compost and livestock.
B. "Commercial aquacultural production" means the commercial production of
cultured fish, shellfish, seaweed or other marine plants for human and animal
consumption, including:
(1) All cultivating activities occurring at hatcheries or nurseries, from the egg,
larval or spore stage to the transfer of the product to a growing site; and
(2) All cultivating activities occurring on water, from the receipt of fish, shellfish,
seaweed or other marine plants from onshore facilities to the delivery of harvested
products to onshore facilities for processing.
C. "Commercial fishing" means attempting to catch fish or any other marine animals
or organisms with the intent of disposing of them for profit or trade in commercial
channels and does not include subsistence fishing for personal use, sport fishing or
charter boat fishing in which the vessel is used for carrying sport anglers to available
fishing grounds.
D. "Commercial wood harvesting" means the commercial severance and yarding of
trees for sale or for processing into logs, pulpwood, bolt wood, wood chips, stud wood,
poles, pilings, biomass or fuel wood or other products commonly known as forest
products.
E. "Depreciable machinery and equipment" means, except as otherwise provided by
this paragraph, that part of the following machinery and equipment for which
depreciation is allowable under the Code and repair parts for that machinery and
equipment:
(1) New or used machinery and equipment used directly and primarily in
commercial agricultural production, including self-propelled vehicles; attachments
and equipment for the production of field and orchard crops; new or used
Page 1 - 132LR1819(01)

413 machinery and equipment for use directly and primarily in production of milk,
424 maple syrup or honey, animal husbandry and production of livestock, including
435 poultry; new or used machinery and equipment used in the removal and storage of
446 manure; and new or used machinery and equipment not used directly and primarily
457 in commercial agricultural production but used to transport potatoes from a truck
468 into a storage location;
(2) New or used watercraft, nets, traps, cables, tackle and related equipment
necessary to and used directly and primarily in commercial fishing;
(3) New or used watercraft, machinery or equipment used directly and primarily
for commercial aquacultural production, including, but not limited to: nets; ropes;
cables; anchors and anchor weights; shackles and other hardware; buoys; fish
tanks; fish totes; oxygen tanks; pumping systems; generators; water-heating
systems; boilers and related pumping systems; diving equipment; feeders and
related equipment; power-generating equipment; tank water-level sensors;
aboveground piping; water-oxygenating systems; fish-grading equipment; safety
equipment; and sea cage systems, including walkways and frames, lights, netting,
buoys, shackles, ropes, cables, anchors and anchor weights; and
(4) New or used machinery and equipment used directly and primarily in
commercial wood harvesting, including, but not limited to, chain saws, skidders,
delimbers, forwarders, slashers, feller bunchers and wood chippers.
"Depreciable machinery and equipment" does not include a motor vehicle as defined
in section 1752, subsection 7 or a trailer as defined in section 1752, subsection 19-A.
F. "Family member" means, whether by blood or legal adoption, the decedent's sibling
or the spouse of a sibling; parent or grandparent, or the spouse of a parent or
grandparent; ancestor; or lineal descendant.
G. "Farmland" means land that is or could be classified as farmland under chapter 105,
subchapter 10 and includes personal property that is exempt from personal property tax
under section 655, subsection 1, paragraph C, D, M or O.
2. Additional exclusion amount. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, an additional exclusion amount from the estate tax under this chapter of up to
$3,800,000 is allowed for farmland or depreciable machinery and equipment that is part of
an estate of a decedent dying on or after January 1, 2026 that is transferred to a family
member of the decedent.
3. Requirements for additional exclusion; report. In order to qualify for the
additional exclusion from the estate tax pursuant to this section:
A. The farmland or depreciable machinery and equipment must be transferred to a
family member;
B. For at least 5 years following the transfer, the farmland or depreciable machinery
and equipment must remain the property of the family member to whom the farmland
or depreciable machinery and equipment was transferred or, in the event of the death
of that transferee, a family member of that transferee; and
C. During the 5 years under paragraph B following the transfer:
Page 2 - 132LR1819(01)

(1) The land transferred must continue to meet the requirements for classification
as farmland under chapter 105, subchapter 10, except that the gross income
requirements of section 1102, subsection 4 must be met for every year of the 5
years following transfer; and
(2) The depreciable machinery and equipment transferred must continue to be used
for commercial agricultural production, commercial aquacultural production,
commercial fishing or commercial wood harvesting for every year of the 5 years
following transfer.
A family member to whom farmland or depreciable machinery and equipment is
transferred who wishes to claim the additional exclusion under this section shall file a report
annually for the 5 years following the transfer with the assessor certifying that the farmland
or depreciable machinery and equipment continues to qualify for the additional exclusion.
4. Failure to maintain requirements for additional exclusion. If, at any time during
the 5 years following the decedent's death, the farmland or depreciable machinery and
equipment transferred does not meet the requirements of subsection 3, the owner of the
farmland or depreciable machinery and equipment is subject to the applicable tax specified
in this chapter based on the fair market value of the farmland or depreciable machinery and
equipment as of the date of the decedent's death.
5. Rules. The assessor shall adopt routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A to implement this section, including determining the method of
providing certification of qualification for the additional exclusion provided by this section.